Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-107
Notice to Banking, Commerce and Insurance Committee of the Legislature; hearing.

The Department of Insurance shall notify the chairperson and members of the Banking, Commerce and Insurance Committee of the Legislature prior to submitting any request or application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services for a state innovation waiver under section 1332 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. Such notification shall be made electronically and shall include a copy of the application for the federal waiver. The Banking, Commerce and Insurance Committee of the Legislature shall hold a public hearing on such waiver application.

Laws 2019, LB468, § 4.